en: dehydrated broth, dehydrated stock
de: Bouillon getrocknet
fr: bouillon déshydraté
it: brodo disidratato

en: cooking broth
de: Suppenbrühe
fr: bouillon de cuisson
hr: juha za kuhanje
it: brodo di cottura

en: poultry broth
bg: птичи бульон
da: Hønsekødsbouillon
de: Geflügelbouillon
es: Caldo de ave
fi: siipikarjaliemi
fr: bouillon de volaille, Bouillons de volaille
hr: juha od peradi
it: Brodo di pollame
ja: 鶏肉スープ
nl: gevogeltebouillon
pl: bulion drobiowy

en: poultry fond
fr: fond de volaille
it: fondo di pollame

en: chickend fond
fr: fond de poulet
it: fondo di pollo

en: duck fond
fr: fond de canard
it: fondo d'anatra

en: turkey fond
fr: fond de dine
it: fondo di tacchino

en: shellfish fond
fr: fond de crustacés
it: fondo di molluschi e crostacei

en: flavored poultry fond
fr: fond de volaille aromatisé
it: fondo di pollame aromatizzato

en: dehydrated poultry stock, dehydrated poultry bouillon
fr: bouillon de volaille déshydraté
it: brodo di pollame disidratato

en: dehydrated poultry fond, Poultry stock for sauce and cooking dehydrated
fr: fond de volaille déshydraté, Fond de volaille pour sauces et cuisson déshydraté
it: fondo di pollame disidratato

en: chicken broth, chicken stock
bg: пилешки бульон
bs: kokošja supa
ca: brou de pollastre
da: Kyllingebouillon
de: Hühnerbrühe
es: Caldo de pollo
fi: kanaliemi
fr: Bouillon de poulet
hr: pileća juha
it: brodo di pollo
ja: チキンスープ, チキンブイヨン
nl: Kippenbouillon
pl: Rosół z kurczaka
sv: kycklingbuljong, kycklingfond

en: vegetable broth
bg: зеленчуков бульон
ca: brou vegetal
da: grøntsagsbouillon
de: Gemüsebouillon, Gemüsebrühe
es: Caldo de verduras
fi: kasvisliemi
fr: bouillon végétal, bouillon de légume
hr: juha od povrća
it: brodo vegetale
nl: groentebouillon, groentenbouillon
pl: bulion warzywny, bulion roślinny, bulion wegetariański
sv: grönsaksbuljong

en: meat stock, meat broth
bg: месен бульон
ca: brou de carn
de: Fleischbrühe
es: caldo de carne
fi: lihaliemi
fr: bouillon de viande
hr: temeljac od mesa
it: brodo di carne
pl: wywar mięsny
sv: köttbuljong, köttfond

en: white dashi
it: dashi bianco
ja: 白だし

en: lemonade, Lemonades
ar: شراب الليمون
az: Limonad
ba: Лимонад
be: ліманад
bg: Лимонада
bs: Limunada
ca: llimonada
cs: limonáda
cv: Лимонад
cy: Lemonêd
da: Limonade
de: limonade, Limonaden, Zitronenlimonade
el: Λεμονάδα
eo: Limonado
es: limonada, Limonadas
et: Limonaad
eu: Limonada
fa: شربت آبلیمو
fi: limonadi
fr: limonade, Limonades
ga: Líomanáid Dhearg
gl: Limoada
he: לימונדה
hr: limunada
hu: limonádé
hy: Լիմոնադ
id: Limun
io: Limonado
it: limonata, Bibita gassata
ja: レモネード
kk: Лимонад
ko: 레모네이드
la: Limonata
lb: Limonad
lt: Limonadas
mk: Лимонада
ml: നാരങ്ങാവെള്ളം
mr: लिंबू सरबत
nb: limonade
ne: लेमोनेड
nl: Limonade, Limonades
oc: limonada
pa: ਸ਼ਿਕੰਜਵੀ
pl: Lemoniada, lemoniady
pt: limonada
ro: Limonadă, Limonada
ru: лимонад
sd: سڪنجبين
sh: Limunada
sr: лимунада
ta: எலுமிச்சைச்சாறு
tr: Limonata
uk: лимонад
ur: سکنجبین
uz: Limonad
zh: 檸檬水

en: soy preparation
bg: соев препарат
ca: preparació de soja
cs: sójový přípravek
da: sojapræparat
de: Sojabereitung, Soja-Produkt, Sojaprodukt, Sojamittel, Sojaerzeugnis
es: preparación de soja
fi: Soijavalmiste
fr: préparation à base de soja
hr: pripravak od soje
hu: szójakészítmény
it: preparazione di soia
nl: sojabereiding
pl: preparat sojowy
pt: preparado à base de soja
ro: preparat din soia
sk: sójový prípravok
sv: sojabönsberedning

en: orange preparation
nl: sinaasappelbereiding

en: soy milk, soy drink
an: Leit de soya
ar: حليب الصويا
bg: Соево мляко
bn: সয়াদুধ
ca: llet de soia
cs: Sojové mléko
de: Sojamilch, Sojadrink
el: γάλα σόγιας
eo: sojlakto
es: bebida de soja, bebida de soya, leche de soya, Licuado de soja, leche de soja
et: Sojapiim
eu: Soja-esne
fa: شیر سویا
fi: soijajuoma, soijamaito
fr: lait de soja, tonyu
gl: bebida de soia
he: חלב סויה
hi: सोया दूध
hr: sojino mlijeko
id: Susu kacang
is: Sojamjólk
it: latte di soia
ja: 豆乳
jv: Susu kedhelé
ko: 두유
lo: ນ້ຳເຕົ້າຮູ້
lt: Sojų pienas
mk: соино млеко
ms: Air kacang soya
nb: soyamelk
nl: Sojamelk
pl: Mleko sojowe
pt: leite de soja
ru: Соевое молоко
sk: Sójové mlieko
sr: Sojino mleko
sv: sojamjölk
te: సోయా పాలు
th: น้ำเต้าหู้
tr: Soya sütü
uk: Соєве молоко
vi: Sữa đậu nành
zh: 豆浆

en: mirepoix
xx: mirepoix
be: Мірпуа
ca: bresa
el: μιρεπουά
fa: سبزیجات استاک
he: מירפואה
ja: ミルポワ
ko: 미르푸아
pl: Włoszczyzna
ru: мирпуа
sl: jušna zelenjava
sv: Mire poix
th: มีร์ปัว
tr: mirpua
uk: Мірпуа
zh: 米尔普瓦